Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 5

County and Regional Housing Authorities

13-20-501. Creation and powers of authority for a county.

Except as otherwise provided herein, a housing authority may be created for any county, and the commissioners of such authority may be appointed, in the same manner as provided in this chapter, for the creation of a housing authority for a city and the appointment of the commissioners of such authority. Each housing authority created for a county and the commissioners thereof shall have the same functions, rights, powers, duties, privileges, immunities and limitations provided for housing authorities created for cities and the commissioners of such housing authorities, and all law applicable to housing authorities created for cities and the commissioners of such authorities shall be applicable to housing authorities created for counties and the commissioners of such authorities.

For all such purposes, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“City” or “city and the area within ten (10) miles from the territorial boundaries thereof” means county;

“City clerk” means county clerk; and

“Mayor” or “council” as used in this chapter and any amendment thereto are construed as meaning county legislative body.

A housing authority created for a county shall not be subject to the limitations provided in § 13-20-113(a)(4) with respect to housing projects for farmers of low income.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 33, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.26 (Williams, § 3647.29i); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1001.

Cross-References. Advisory board, creation, § 13-20-208.

Blighted areas, title 13, ch. 20, part 2.

Bonds, form and sale, § 13-20-602.

Bonds, trust indentures and mortgages, power of authority, § 13-20-603.

Bonds, types, § 13-20-601.

Cooperation of authorities in exercise of powers, § 13-20-107.

Farmers of low income, §§ 13-20-102, 13-20-508, 13-20-509, 13-20-510.

Housing research and studies, § 13-20-106.

Meetings of commissioners, § 13-20-103.

Powers of housing authority, § 13-20-104.

Power to mortgage when project financed with aid of government, § 13-20-604.

Rentals and tenant selection, § 13-20-113.

Residence of commissioners, § 13-20-103.

13-20-502. Creation of regional housing authority.

If the legislative body of each of two (2) or more contiguous counties by resolution declares that there is a need for one (1) housing authority to be created for all such counties to exercise in such counties powers and other functions prescribed for a regional housing authority, a public body corporate and politic to be known as a regional housing authority shall, after the commissioners thereof file an application with the secretary of state as hereinafter provided, exist for all of such counties and exercise its powers and other functions in such counties; and thereupon, any county housing authority created for any of such counties shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed to the regional housing authority as hereinafter provided; provided, that the legislative body of a county shall not adopt a resolution as aforementioned if there is a county housing authority created for such county which has any bonds or notes outstanding, unless:

First, all holders of such bonds and notes consent in writing to the substitution of such regional housing authority in lieu of such county housing authority on all such bonds and notes; and

Second, the commissioners of such county housing authority adopt a resolution consenting to the transfer of all the rights, contracts, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority, to such regional housing authority as hereinafter provided;

and provided further, that when there is compliance with the above two (2) conditions and such regional housing authority is created and authorized to exercise its powers and other functions, all rights, contracts, agreements, obligations and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority, shall be in the name of and vest in such regional housing authority, and all obligations of such county housing authority shall be the obligations of such regional housing authority, and all rights and remedies of any person against such county housing authority may be asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such regional housing authority to the same extent as they might have been asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such county housing authority.

When any real property of a county housing authority vests in a regional housing authority as provided above, the county housing authority shall execute a deed of such property to the regional housing authority which thereupon shall file such deed in the office provided for the filing of deeds; provided, that nothing contained in this sentence shall affect the vesting of property in the regional housing authority as provided above.

The legislative body of each of two (2) or more contiguous counties shall by resolution declare that there is a need for one (1) regional housing authority to be created for all of such counties to exercise in such counties powers and other functions prescribed for a regional housing authority, only if such county legislative body finds that:

Unsanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such county or there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford; and

A regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit than a housing authority of such county.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 34, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.27 (Williams, § 3647.29j); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1002.

13-20-503. Area of operation of county and regional housing authorities.

The area of operation or boundaries of a housing authority created for a county shall include all of the county for which it is created, and the area of operation or boundaries of a regional housing authority shall include, except as otherwise provided elsewhere in this chapter, all of the counties for which such regional housing authority is created and established; provided, that a county or regional housing authority shall not undertake any housing project or projects within the boundaries of any city or other municipality of more than two thousand (2,000) inhabitants, unless a resolution has been adopted by the governing body of such city or other municipality, and also by any housing authority which has been theretofore established and authorized to exercise its powers in such city or other municipality, declaring that there is a need for the county or regional housing authority to exercise its powers within such city or other municipality.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 35, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.28 (Williams, § 3647.29k); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1003.

Cross-References. Zoning and building laws, housing projects subject to, § 13-20-112.

13-20-504. Increasing area of operation of regional housing authority.

The area of operation or boundaries of a regional housing authority may be increased from time to time to include one (1) or more additional contiguous counties not already within a regional housing authority, if the legislative body of each of the counties then included in the area of operation of such regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority and the legislative body of each such additional county or counties adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for the inclusion of such additional county or counties in the area of operation of such regional housing authority. Upon the adoption of such resolution, any county housing authority created for any such additional county shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed to the regional housing authority as hereinafter provided; provided, that such resolutions shall not be adopted if there is a county housing authority created for any such additional county which has any bonds or notes outstanding unless:

First, all holders of such bonds and notes consent in writing to the substitution of such regional housing authority in lieu of such county housing authority as the obligor thereon; and

Second, the commissioners of such county housing authority adopt a resolution consenting to the transfers of all rights, contracts, bonds and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority to such regional housing authority as hereinafter provided.

When there is compliance with the above two (2) conditions and the area of operation of such regional housing authority is increased to include such additional county, as hereinabove provided, all rights, contracts, bonds, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority shall be in the name of and vest in such regional housing authority, all contracts and bonds of such county housing authority shall be the contracts and bonds of such regional housing authority and all rights and remedies of any person against such county housing authority may be asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such regional housing authority to the same extent as they might have been asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such county housing authority.

When any real property of a county housing authority vests in a regional housing authority as provided above, the county housing authority shall execute a deed of such property to the regional housing authority, which thereupon shall file such deed in the office provided for the filing of deeds; provided, that nothing contained in this subsection (b) shall affect the vesting of property in the regional housing authority as provided above.

The legislative body of each of the counties in the regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority and the legislative body of each such additional county or counties shall by resolution declare that there is a need for the inclusion of such county or counties in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, only if:

The legislative body of each such additional county or counties finds that unsanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such county or there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford; and

The legislative body of each of the counties then included in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority and the legislative body of each such additional county or counties find that the regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit if the area of operation of the regional housing authority is increased to include such additional county or counties.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 36, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29 (Williams, § 3647.29l ); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1004.

13-20-505. Decreasing area of operation of regional housing authority.

The area of operation or boundaries of a regional housing authority may be decreased from time to time to exclude one (1) or more counties from such area if the legislative body of each of the counties in such area and the commissioners of the regional housing authority each adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for excluding such county or counties from such area; provided, that no action may be taken pursuant to this section if the regional housing authority has outstanding any bonds or notes, unless, first, all holders of such bonds and notes consent in writing to such action. If such action decreases the area of operation of the regional housing authority to only one (1) county, such authority shall thereupon constitute and become a housing authority for such county, in the same manner as though such authority were created and constituted a public and corporate body for such county pursuant to other provisions of this chapter, and the commissioners of such authority shall be thereupon appointed as provided for the appointment of commissioners of a housing authority created for a county.

The legislative body of each of the counties in the area of operation of the regional housing authority and the commissioners of the regional housing authority shall adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for excluding a county or counties from such area if:

Each such legislative body of the counties to remain in the area of operation of the regional housing authority and the commissioners of the regional housing authority find that, because of facts arising or determined subsequent to the time when such area first included the county or counties to be excluded, the regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit if such county or counties were excluded from such area; and

The legislative body of each such county or counties to be excluded and the commissioners of the regional housing authority each also find that, because of the aforementioned changed facts, another housing authority for such county or counties would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit to function in such county or counties.

Nothing contained in this subsection (b) shall be construed as preventing a county or counties excluded from the area of operation of a regional housing authority, as provided above, from thereafter being included within the area of operation of any housing authority in accordance with this chapter.

Any property held by a regional housing authority within a county or counties excluded from the area of operation of such authority, as herein provided, shall, as soon as practicable after the exclusion of the county or counties respectively, be disposed of by such authority in the public interest.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 37, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29A (Williams, § 3647.29m); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1005.

13-20-506. Requirements of public hearings — Application to secretary of state for creation of authorities.

The legislative body of a county shall not adopt any resolution authorized by § 13-20-502, § 13-20-504 or § 13-20-505 unless a public hearing has first been held which shall conform, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, to the requirements of § 13-20-402 for hearings to determine the need for a housing authority of a city; provided, that such hearings may be held by the legislative body without a petition therefor. No housing authority shall constitute a body corporate and politic until the commissioners of such authority have filed and recorded an application with the secretary of state, which shall conform, insofar as possible, to §§ 13-20-403 and 13-20-404 for the making, filing and recording of an application to the secretary of state by the commissioners of a housing authority created for a city; provided, that any such application filed and recorded hereunder shall set forth that the public hearing or hearings, as required by this chapter, have been held.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of other obligations, a regional housing authority may covenant as to limitations on its right to adopt resolutions relating to the increase or decrease of its area of operation.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 38, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29B (Williams, § 3647.29n); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1006.

13-20-507. Commissioners of regional housing authority — Appointment — Term — Vacancies — Powers — Organization.

The legislative body of each county included in a regional housing authority shall appoint one (1) person as a commissioner of such authority, and each such commissioner to be first appointed by the legislative body of a county may be appointed at or after the time of the adoption of the resolution declaring the need for such regional housing authority, or of declaring the need for the inclusion of such county in the area of operation of such regional housing authority. When the area of operation of a regional housing authority is increased to include an additional county or counties as provided above, the legislative body of each such county shall thereupon appoint one (1) additional person as a commissioner of the regional housing authority. The legislative body of each county shall appoint the successor of the commissioner appointed by it. If any county is excluded from the area of operation of a regional housing authority, the office of the commissioner of such regional housing authority appointed by the legislative body of such county shall be thereupon abolished.

If the area of operation of a regional housing authority consists at any time of an even number of counties, the commissioners of the regional housing authority appointed by the legislative bodies of such counties shall appoint one (1) additional commissioner, as well as such person's successor, whose term of office shall be as herein provided for a commissioner of a regional housing authority, except that such term shall end at any earlier time when the area of operation of the regional housing authority shall be changed to consist of an odd number of counties. A certificate of the appointment of any commissioner of a regional housing authority shall be signed by the appointing officer or officers and filed with the other records of the regional housing authority, and shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.

The commissioners shall be appointed for terms of five (5) years, except that all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. Each commissioner shall hold office until such commissioner's successor has been appointed and has qualified, except as otherwise provided herein. For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner may be removed by the officer or officers, or their successors, appointing such commissioner, but such commissioner shall be removed only after such commissioner has been given a copy of the charges at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing thereon and has had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. In the event of the removal of such commissioner, a record of the proceedings, together with the charges and findings thereon, shall be filed with the other records of the regional housing authority.

The commissioners shall constitute the regional housing authority, and the powers of such authority shall be vested in such commissioners in office from time to time.

The commissioners shall elect a chair from among the commissioners and shall have power to select or employ such other officers and employees as the regional housing authority may require. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum of such authority for the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 39, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29C (Williams, § 3647.29o); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1007.

Cross-References. Advisory board, creation, § 13-20-208.

Cooperation of authorities and exercise of powers, § 13-20-107.

Meetings and residence of commissioners, § 13-20-103.

13-20-508. Powers of regional housing authority.

Except as otherwise provided herein, a regional housing authority and the commissioners thereof shall, within the area of operation of such regional housing authority, have the same functions, rights, powers, duties, privileges, immunities and limitations provided for housing authorities created for cities or counties and the commissioners of such housing authorities, and all law applicable to housing authorities created for cities or counties and the commissioners of such authorities shall be applicable to regional housing authorities and the commissioners thereof.

For such purposes, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“City” means county;

“City clerk” means county clerk; and

“Mayor” or “council” as used in this chapter, and any amendments thereto, means county legislative body.

A regional housing authority shall not be subject to the limitations provided in § 13-20-113(a)(4) with respect to housing projects for farmers of low income.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 40, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29D (Williams, § 3647.29p); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1008.

Cross-References. Blighted areas, title 13, ch. 20, part 2.

Bonds, form and sale, § 13-20-602.

Bonds, trust indentures and mortgages, power of authority, § 13-20-603.

Bonds, types, § 13-20-601.

Contracts with federal government authorized, § 13-20-610.

Farmers of low income, §§ 13-20-102, 13-20-501, 13-20-509, 13-20-510.

Housing applications by farmers, § 13-20-510.

Housing research and studies, § 13-20-106.

Mortgage, power of when project financed with aid of government, § 13-20-604.

Powers of housing authority, § 13-20-104.

13-20-509. Rural housing projects.

Housing authorities created for counties and regional housing authorities are specifically empowered and authorized to borrow money, accept grants and exercise their other powers to provide housing for farmers of low income. In connection with such projects, such housing authorities may enter into such leases or purchase agreements, accept such conveyances and rent or sell dwellings forming part of such projects to or for farmers of low income, as such housing authority deems necessary in order to assure the achievement of the objectives of this chapter. Such leases, agreements or conveyances may include such covenants as the housing authority deems appropriate regarding such dwellings and the tracts of land described in any such instrument, which covenants shall be deemed to run with the land where the housing authority deems it necessary and the parties to such instrument so stipulate. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as limiting any other powers of any housing authority.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 46, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29J (Williams, § 3647.29v); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1009.

Cross-References. Farmers of low income, §§ 13-20-102, 13-20-501, 13-20-508, 13-21-510.

13-20-510. Housing applications by farmers.

The owner of any farm operated, or worked upon, by farmers of low income in need of safe and sanitary housing may file an application with a housing authority of a county or regional housing authority requesting that it provide for a safe and sanitary dwelling or dwellings for occupancy of such farmers of low income. Such applications shall be received and examined by housing authorities in connection with the formulation of projects or programs to provide housing for farmers of low income.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 47, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29K (Williams, § 3647.29w); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1010.

Cross-References. Farmers of low income, §§ 13-20-102, 13-20-501, 13-20-508, 13-20-509.

13-20-511. Housing in rural areas — Tax exemption.

A regional or county housing authority has the power to sell or rent dwellings outside of cities and to make or accept such conveyances or leases as it deems necessary to carry out the rural housing purposes of this chapter. With respect to such housing, a county and regional housing authority shall not be subject to the tenant selection limitations provided in § 13-20-113(a)(4).

No dwelling shall be provided on a farm by a county or regional authority unless it has determined that, by reason of the character of the farm with respect to which the dwelling is to be constructed and the manner of its operation, the owner is likely successfully to carry out the undertakings required of such owner under the owner's purchase agreement or lease.

Until a purchaser makes full payment for a dwelling which is constructed by a county or regional authority on such purchaser's farm, such dwelling shall continue to be the property of such authority regardless of the title to the land on which it is constructed, and such dwelling shall be exempt from taxation in the same manner as other property of such authority. Any document making land available for use by such authority shall be admitted to record, and accordingly constitute notice, in the same manner as a deed or other instrument relating to real estate.

When a county or regional authority provides a dwelling on a farm hereunder, the owner of the farm living in the dwelling under a lease or purchase agreement shall be entitled to receive the same homestead exemption as if such owner had title to the dwelling.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 48, as added by Acts 1945, ch. 102, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29L (Williams, § 3647.29x); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1011.